Ohio, session 136, SB50.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Ohio: Section 1. That sections 3331.02 and 4109.07 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 3331.02. (A) The superintendent of schools or the chief administrative officer, as appropriate pursuant to section 3331.01 of the Revised Code, shall not issue an age and schooling certificate until the superintendent or chief administrative officer has received, examined, approved, and filed the following papers duly executed: (1) The written pledge or promise of the person, partnership, or corporation to legally employ the child, and for this purpose work performed by a minor, directly and exclusively for the benefit of such minor's parent, in the farm home or on the farm of such parent is legal employment, irrespective of any contract of employment, or the absence thereof, to permit the child to attend school as provided in section 3321.08 of the Revised Code, and give notice of the nonuse of an age and schooling certificate within five days from the date of the child's withdrawal or dismissal from the service of that person, partnership, or corporation, giving the reasons for such withdrawal or dismissal; (2) The child's school record or notification. As used in this division, a "school record" means documents properly filled out and signed by the person in charge of the school which the child last attended, giving the recorded age of the child, the child's address, standing in studies, rating in conduct, and attendance in days during the school year of the child's last attendance; "notification" means the information submitted to the superintendent by the parent of a child exempt from attendance at school pursuant to section 3321.042 of the Revised Code. (3) Evidence of the age of the child as follows: (a) A certified copy of an original birth record or a certification of birth, issued in accordance with Chapter 3705. of the Revised Code, or by an officer charged with the duty of recording births in another state or country, shall be conclusive evidence of the age of the child; (b) In the absence of such birth record or certification of birth, a passport, or duly attested transcript thereof, showing the date and place of birth of the child, filed with a register of passports at a port of entry of the United States; or an attested transcript of the certificate of birth or baptism or other religious record, showing the date and place of birth of the child, shall be conclusive evidence of the age of the child; (c) In case none of the above proofs of age can be produced, other documentary evidence, except the affidavit of the parent, guardian, or custodian, satisfactory to the superintendent or chief administrative officer may be accepted in lieu thereof; (d) In case no documentary proof of age can be procured, the superintendent or chief administrative officer may receive and file an application signed by the parent, guardian, or custodian of the child that a medical certificate be secured to establish the sufficiency of the age of the child, which application shall state the alleged age of the child, the place and date of birth, the child's present residence, and such further facts as may be of assistance in determining the age of the child, and shall certify that the person signing the application is unable to obtain any of the documentary proofs specified in divisions (A)(3)(a), (b), and (c) of this section; and if the superintendent or chief administrative officer is satisfied that a reasonable effort to procure such documentary proof has been without success such application shall be granted and the certificate of the school physician or if there be none, of a physician, a physician assistant, a clinical nurse specialist, or a certified nurse practitioner employed by the board of education, that said physician, physician assistant, clinical nurse specialist, or certified nurse practitioner is satisfied that the child is above the age required for an age and schooling certificate as stated in section 3331.01 of the Revised Code, shall be accepted as sufficient evidence of age. (4) A certificate, including an athletic certificate of examination, from a physician licensed pursuant to Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code, a physician assistant, a clinical nurse specialist, or a certified nurse practitioner, or from the district health commissioner, showing after a thorough examination that the child is physically fit to be employed in such occupations as are not prohibited by law for a boy or girl, as the case may be, under eighteen years of age; but a certificate with "limited" written, printed, marked, or stamped thereon may be furnished by such physician, physician assistant, clinical nurse specialist, or certified nurse practitioner and accepted by the superintendent or chief administrative officer in issuing a "limited" age and schooling certificate provided in section 3331.06 of the Revised Code, showing that the child is physically fit to be employed in some particular occupation not prohibited by law for a boy or girl of such child's age, as the case may be, even if the child's complete physical ability to engage in such occupation cannot be vouched for. (5) A minor work hour notification form described in division (D) of this section that is signed by the child's parent or legal guardian. (B)(1) Except as provided in division (B)(2) of this section, a physical fitness certificate described in division (A)(4) of this section is valid for purposes of that division while the child remains employed in job duties of a similar nature as the job duties for which the child last was issued an age and schooling certificate. The superintendent or chief administrative officer who issues an age and schooling certificate shall determine whether job duties are similar for purposes of this division. (2) A "limited" physical fitness certificate described in division (A)(4) of this section is valid for one year. (C) The superintendent of schools or the chief administrative officer shall require a child who resides out of this state to file all the information required under division (A) of this section. The superintendent of schools or the chief administrative officer shall evaluate the information filed and determine whether to issue the age and schooling certificate using the same standards as those the superintendent or officer uses for in-state children. (D) The director of commerce shall create, and make available to the public, a minor work hour notification form that provides notice of the hours a minor may work in accordance with section 4109.07 of the Revised Code. The director shall include on the form a space for a child's parent or legal guardian to provide a signature. By signing the form, the parent or guardian acknowledges that the parent or guardian has received notice of the information on the form. Sec. 4109.07. (A) No person under sixteen years of age shall be employed: (1) During school hours except where specifically permitted by this chapter; (2) Before seven a.m.; (3) After nine p.m. from the first day of June to the first day of September or during any school holiday of five school days or more duration, or after ; (4) After seven p.m. at any other time, except the person may be employed between seven p.m. and nine p.m. if the person has approval to do so from the person's parent or legal guardian; (4)(5) For more than three hours a day in any school day; (5)(6) For more than eighteen hours in any week while school is in session; (6)(7) For more than eight hours in any day which is not a school day; (7)(8) For more than forty hours in any week that school is not in session. (B) No person under sixteen years of age may be employed more than forty hours in any one week nor during school hours unless employment is incidental to bona fide programs of vocational cooperative training, work-study, or other work- oriented programs with the purpose of educating students, and the program meets standards established by the department of education and workforce. (C) No employer shall employ a minor more than five consecutive hours without allowing the minor a rest period of at least thirty minutes. The rest period need not be included in the computation of the number of hours worked by the minor. (D) No person sixteen or seventeen years of age who is required to attend school under Chapter 3321. of the Revised Code shall be employed: (1) Before seven a.m. on any day that school is in session, except such person may be employed after six a.m. if the person was not employed after eight p.m. the previous night; (2) After eleven p.m. on any night preceding a day that school is in session. (E) As used in this section, "school" refers to either a school the child actually attends or a school he is required to attend pursuant to Chapter 3321. of the Revised Code. Section 2. That existing sections 3331.02 and 4109.07 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Speaker ___________________ of the House of Representatives. President ___________________ of the Senate. Passed ________________________, 20____ Approved ________________________, 20____ Governor. The section numbering of law of a general and permanent nature is complete and in conformity with the Revised Code. Director, Legislative Service Commission. Filed in the office of the Secretary of State at Columbus, Ohio, on the ____ day of ___________, A. D. 20____. Secretary of State. File No. _________	Effective Date ___________________